Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 653	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 653	ore	eya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 653	ore	eyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 653	ore	éyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 653	ore	éyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 653	ore	eyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 654	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 654	ore	eja/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 654	ore	eges/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 654	ore	ejam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 654	ore	ejau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 654	ore	egen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 655	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 655	ore	era	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 655	ore	eres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 655	ore	érem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 655	ore	éreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 655	ore	eren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 656	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 656	ore	eïa	.		#imperfecte
SFX 656	ore	eïes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 656	ore	eíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 656	ore	eíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 656	ore	eïen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 657	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 657	ore	iu	.		#perfecte
SFX 657	ore	eres	.		#perfecte
SFX 657	ore	eu	.		#perfecte
SFX 657	ore	érem	.		#perfecte
SFX 657	ore	éreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 657	ore	eren	.		#perfecte

SFX 658	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 658	ore	ea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 658	ore	ees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 658	ore	éem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 658	ore	éeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 658	ore	een	.		#imperfecte

SFX 659	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 659	ore	eig/453	.		#present
SFX 659	ore	eus/453	.		#present
SFX 659	ore	eu/453	.		#present
SFX 659	ore	eem/453	.		#present
SFX 659	ore	eeu/453	.		#present
SFX 659	ore	euen/453	.		#present

SFX 660	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 660	ore	ore/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 660	ore	eges/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 660	ore	eja/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 660	ore	ejam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 660	ore	ejau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 660	ore	egen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 661	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 661	r	r/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 661	r	s/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 662	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 662	0	a	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 662	0	es	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 662	0	em	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 662	0	eu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 662	0	en	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 663	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 663	0	é	.		#futur
SFX 663	0	às	.		#futur
SFX 663	0	à	.		#futur
SFX 663	0	em	.		#futur
SFX 663	0	eu	.		#futur
SFX 663	0	en	.		#futur

SFX 664	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 664	ànyer	ànyer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 664	ànyer	any/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 664	ànyer	anyga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 664	ànyer	anygam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 664	ànyer	anygau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 664	ànyer	anyguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 665	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 665	òrcer	orcera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 665	òrcer	orceres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 665	òrcer	orcérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 665	òrcer	orcéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 665	òrcer	orceren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 666	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 666	òrcer	orç/453	.		#present
SFX 666	òrcer	orces/453	.		#present
SFX 666	òrcer	orcem/453	.		#present
SFX 666	òrcer	orceu/453	.		#present
SFX 666	òrcer	orcen/453	.		#present

SFX 667	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 667	òrcer	òrcer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 667	òrcer	orç/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 667	òrcer	orça/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 667	òrcer	orçam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 667	òrcer	orçau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 667	òrcer	orcen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 668	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 668	òrcer	orça/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 668	òrcer	orces/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 668	òrcer	orçam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 668	òrcer	orçau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 668	òrcer	orcen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 669	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 669	òrcer	orceré	.		#futur
SFX 669	òrcer	orceràs	.		#futur
SFX 669	òrcer	orcerà	.		#futur
SFX 669	òrcer	orcerem	.		#futur
SFX 669	òrcer	orcereu	.		#futur
SFX 669	òrcer	orceran	.		#futur

SFX 670	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 670	òrcer	orceria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 670	òrcer	orceries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 670	òrcer	orceríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 670	òrcer	orceríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 670	òrcer	orcerien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 671	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 671	òrcer	orcí	.		#perfecte
SFX 671	òrcer	orceres	.		#perfecte
SFX 671	òrcer	orcé	.		#perfecte
SFX 671	òrcer	orcérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 671	òrcer	orcéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 671	òrcer	orceren	.		#perfecte

SFX 672	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 672	òrcer	orcia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 672	òrcer	orcies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 672	òrcer	orcíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 672	òrcer	orcíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 672	òrcer	orcien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 673	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 673	ar	í	.		#perfecte
SFX 673	ar	ares	.		#perfecte
SFX 673	ar	à	.		#perfecte
SFX 673	ar	àvem	.		#perfecte
SFX 673	ar	àveu	.		#perfecte
SFX 673	ar	aven	.		#perfecte

SFX 674	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 674	caure	quea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 674	caure	quees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 674	caure	quéem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 674	caure	quéeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 674	caure	queen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 675	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 675	caure	queya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 675	caure	queyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 675	caure	quéyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 675	caure	quéyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 675	caure	queyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 676	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 676	entir	entir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 676	entir	intam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 676	entir	intau/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 677	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 677	enyir	enyir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 677	enyir	inya/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 677	enyir	inyam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 677	enyir	inyau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 677	enyir	inyen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 678	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 678	enyir	inyga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 678	enyir	inygues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 678	enyir	inygam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 678	enyir	inygau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 678	enyir	inyguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 679	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 679	er	ria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 679	er	ries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 679	er	ríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 679	er	ríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 679	er	rien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 680	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 680	er	ré	.		#futur
SFX 680	er	ràs	.		#futur
SFX 680	er	rà	.		#futur
SFX 680	er	rem	.		#futur
SFX 680	er	reu	.		#futur
SFX 680	er	ran	.		#futur

SFX 681	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 681	ir	igc/453	.		#present
SFX 681	ir	us/453	.		#present
SFX 681	ir	u/453	.		#present
SFX 681	ir	ïm/453	.		#present
SFX 681	ir	ïu/453	.		#present
SFX 681	ir	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 682	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 682	ir	ir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 682	ir	u/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 682	ir	ja/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 682	ir	jam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 682	ir	jau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 682	ir	gen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 683	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 683	ir	c/453	.		#present
SFX 683	ir	s/453	.		#present
SFX 683	ir	0/453	.		#present
SFX 683	ir	ir/453	.		#present
SFX 683	ir	en/453	.		#present

SFX 684	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 684	ixir	xí	.		#perfecte
SFX 684	ixir	ixires	.		#perfecte
SFX 684	ixir	ixí	.		#perfecte
SFX 684	ixir	ixírem	.		#perfecte
SFX 684	ixir	ixíreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 684	ixir	ixiren	.		#perfecte
