Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
caure/481,482,509,674,675,710,711,712,804,805,1057,1086
decaure/481,482,509,674,675,710,711,712,805,1040,1086
desabellir/455,467,469,470,471,472,663,947,1054
desempachar/455,457,458,459,460,461,462,663,747,878,1054
desemplear/455,457,458,459,460,461,663,747,864,878,1054
deslluir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,516,521,683,828,1055
desoir/455,456,491,493,497,649,681,828,950,1055
destenyir/455,467,468,643,644,677,825,921,922,943,1054
destòrcer/665,666,667,668,669,670,671,672,1081
entreoir/451,455,456,468,491,493,497,649,681,682,795,828,831,948,949,968,1055
entreteixir/451,455,456,467,469,553,554,555,556,557,684,828,1054,1057
entrevore/451,481,482,653,654,655,656,657,658,659,660,1079
examinar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,673,747,828,878,1054
formular/455,456,457,460,461,462,662,747,828,1054
governar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,673,747,828,878,1054
lluir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,516,521,683,828,1055,1057
matinar/455,456,457,459,460,461,462,662,747,828,878,1054
oir/451,455,456,491,493,497,649,681,682,795,828,836,841,999,1001,1055
pertànyer/451,630,631,632,633,634,635,636,664,1076
plànyer/451,630,631,632,633,634,635,636,664,1076
poder/451,559,679,680,885,886,887,924,965,966,967,1107
prevore/451,481,482,653,654,655,656,657,658,659,660,1079
recaure/481,482,509,674,675,710,711,712,804,884,1086
renyir/455,456,467,468,469,643,644,677,678,828,919,1054,1057
resaber/558,559,679,680,744,745,746,754,1091
retenyir/455,456,467,468,469,643,644,678,828,1021,1022,1023,1024,1025,1026,1027,1028,1054
retòrcer/665,666,667,668,669,670,671,672,1081
revore/481,482,653,654,655,656,657,658,659,660,806,807,808,809,810,811,1079
saber/558,559,679,680,744,745,746,754,1091
sobreeixir/455,456,467,469,637,638,639,640,641,642,684,828,909,910,911,912,913,1054,1077
tànyer/630,631,632,633,634,635,636,664,1076
teixir/455,456,467,469,553,554,555,556,557,637,638,639,640,641,642,684,828,1054,1077
tenyir/455,456,467,468,469,643,644,677,678,828,920,1054,1057
tòrcer/665,666,667,668,669,670,671,672,1081
trastornar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,673,747,828,878,1054
vore/481,482,653,654,655,656,657,658,659,660,1057,1079
